src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-voelen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# Orthographic variation in marking of long vowels

  Verb - völen: # Verb 'to feel' - full paradigm
     völen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: völe
     völen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vöölst
     völen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vöölt
     völen+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [völet, völen]

     völen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vöölde
     völen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vööldest
     völen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vöölde
     völen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vöölden

     völen+V+Inf:  völen
     völen+V+PrfPrc:  vööld
     völen+V+PrsPrc:  völen

     völen+V+Imprt+Sg2:  vööl
     völen+V+Imprt+Pl2:  völet
